Washington statutes.
RCW 19.118.160

Arbitration program—When established by attorney general.

If the attorney general is unable to contract with one or more entities to conduct arbitrations, the attorney general shall establish an arbitration program and conduct arbitrations under the procedures and standards established in this chapter.

[ 2009 c 351 s 9; 1989 c 347 s 9; 1987 c 344 s 15.]

NOTES:

Application—2009 c 351: See note following RCW 19.118.021.